Utah statutes.
49-22-204.   Higher education employees' eligibility requirements --
Election between different retirement plans -- Classification requirements --
Transfer between systems.
(1) (a)  Regular full-time employees of institutions of higher education who
are eligible to participate in either this system or in a retirement annuity
contract with the Teachers' Insurance and Annuity Association of America or
with any other public or private system, organization, or company, designated
by the Board of Regents, shall, not later than January 1, 1979, elect to
participate exclusively in this system or in an annuity contract allowed under
this Subsection (1)(a).
(b)  The election is final, and no right exists to make any further election.
(2) (a)  A regular full-time employee hired by an institution of higher
education after January 1, 1979, may participate only in the retirement plan
which attaches to the person's employment classification.
(b)  Each institution of higher education shall prepare or amend existing
employment classifications, under the direction of the Board of Regents, so
that each classification is assigned with either:
(i)  this system;
(ii)  the Teachers' Insurance and Annuity Association of America; or
(iii)  another public or private system, organization, or company designated
by the Board of Regents.
(3)  A regular full-time employee hired by an institution of higher education
on or after July 1, 2011, whose employment classification requires
participation in this system may elect to continue participation in this
system upon change to an employment classification which requires
participation in:
(a)  an annuity plan with the Teachers' Insurance and Annuity Association of
America; or
(b)  another public or private system, organization, or company designated by
the Board of Regents.
(4)  A regular full-time employee hired by an institution of higher education
on or after July 1, 2011, whose employment classification requires
participation in this system shall participate in this system.
